South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S350.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Office of Occupational Safety and Health, relating to Worker Walkaround Representative Designation Process, designated as Regulation Document Number 5338, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Division of Occupational Safety and Health (SC OSHA) proposes to add to and/or amend its regulations regarding the Worker Walkaround Representative Designation Process. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on May 24, 2024. ----XX----